Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.050

Applications—Minimum requirements.

(1) At a minimum, grant applications for specialized and underserved services must include the following:

(a) The geographic area from which the victims to be served are expected to come;

(b) A description of the extent and effect of the needs of these victims within the relevant geographic area;

(c) A proposed budget and an explanation of how the funds will be used, their relationship to existing services available within the community, and the need that they will fulfill;

(d) An explanation of what community organizations were involved in the community coordination that resulted in the development of the proposal; and

(e) Documentation of the applicant's capacity to provide specialized services and services for underserved populations, as defined in this chapter, and a description of how the applicant intends to comply with service standards and data collection as established by the department.

(2) At a minimum, grant applications for core services must include the following:

(a) The geographic area from which the victims to be served are expected to come;

(b) Assurance of the applicant's compliance with service standards, data collection, and management standards established by the department; and

(c) Documentation of the applicant's capacity to provide core services, as defined in this chapter.

[ 2012 c 29 s 4; 1996 c 123 s 4; 1990 c 3 s 1206.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 123: See note following RCW 43.280.010.